Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0152.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 4x. (1) A sale to a domestic air carrier of 1 or more of the following is exempt from the tax under this act: (a) An aircraft that has a maximum certificated takeoff weight of at least 6,000 pounds for use solely in the transport of air cargo, passengers, or a combination of air cargo and passengers. (b) Parts and materials, excluding shop equipment or fuel, affixed or to be affixed to an aircraft that has a maximum certificated takeoff weight of at least 6,000 pounds for use solely in the transport of air cargo, passengers, or a combination of air cargo and passengers.The tax levied under this act does not apply to the sale of an aircraft to a domestic air carrier if the aircraft has a maximum certificated takeoff weight of at least 6,000 pounds and is for use solely in the transport of air cargo, passengers, or a combination of air cargo and passengers. (2) The tax levied under this act does not apply to the sale of parts or materials, excluding shop equipment or fuel, affixed or to be affixed to an aircraft. that meets all of the following conditions: (a) The aircraft leaves this state within 15 days after the sooner of the issuance of the final billing or authorized approval for final return to service, completion of the maintenance record entry, and completion of the test flight and ground test for inspection as required under 14 CFR 91.407. (b) The aircraft was not based in this state or registered in this state before the parts or materials are affixed to the aircraft and the aircraft is not based in this state or registered in this state after the parts or materials are affixed to the aircraft. (3) The tax levied under this act does not apply to the sale of an aircraft temporarily located in this state for the purpose of a sale and prepurchase evaluation, customization, improvement, maintenance, or repair if all of the following conditions are satisfied: (a) The aircraft leaves this state within 15 days after the sale and the completion of any prepurchase evaluation, customization, improvement, maintenance, or repair that is associated with the sale, whichever is later. (b) The aircraft was not based in this state or registered in this state before the sale and any prepurchase evaluation, customization, improvement, maintenance, or repair that is associated with the sale is completed and the aircraft is not based in this state or registered in this state after the sale and any prepurchase evaluation, customization, improvement, maintenance, or repair that is associated with the sale is completed. (4) A sale of an aircraft to a person for subsequent lease to a domestic air carrier operating under a certificate issued by the federal aviation administration Federal Aviation Administration under 14 CFR part 121, for use solely in the regularly scheduled transport of passengers is exempt from the tax under this act. (5) As used in this section: (a) "Aircraft" means an aerial vehicle that is used in aviation, other than an unmanned aerial vehicle. (b) (a) "Based in this state" means hangared or stored in this state for not less than 10 days in not less than 3 nonconsecutive months during the immediately preceding a 12-month period. (c) (b) "Customization" means any improvement, maintenance, or repair that is performed on an aircraft that is associated with the sale of the aircraft. (d) (c) "Domestic air carrier" is limited to entities engaged primarily in the commercial transport for hire of air cargo, passengers, or a combination of air cargo and passengers as a business activity. (e) (d) "Prepurchase evaluation" means an examination of an aircraft to provide a potential purchaser with information relevant to the potential purchase. (f) (e) "Registered in this state" means an aircraft registered with the state transportation department, bureau of aeronautics, or registered with the federal aviation administration Federal Aviation Administration to an address located in this state. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law. Enacting section 2. It is the intent of the legislature to annually appropriate sufficient funds from the state general fund to the state school aid fund created in section 11 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963 to fully compensate for any loss of revenue to the state school aid fund resulting from the enactment of this amendatory act.